Nebraska, session 109, LB598.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB598 LB598
2025 2025
Section 1. (1) On or before January 15 of each school fiscal year,
a school district with expected expenditures for limited English
proficiency students that total (a) at least fifty thousand dollars
annually or (b) one-half percent or more of such school district's annual
budget, whichever is greater, may submit an application as prescribed by
the Commissioner of Education to the State Department of Education for a
payment from the Education Future Fund to cover an extraordinary increase
in limited English proficiency student expenditures pursuant to the
requirements of this section.
(2) Such application shall include the limited English proficiency
student expenditures of the applicant school district as of the
immediately preceding December 31 for the school fiscal year in which the
application is submitted.
(3) The department shall divide the limited English proficiency
student expenditures for the school fiscal year immediately preceding the
school fiscal year in which an application is submitted by two and
multiply the result by one hundred seven percent for each applicant
school district.
(4) Each applicant school district shall qualify for a maximum
payment equal to the difference of the limited English proficiency
student expenditures for the current school fiscal year submitted
pursuant to subsection (1) of this section minus the amount calculated
pursuant to subsection (3) of this section for such school district for
such school fiscal year.
(5) The department shall make a payment to each applicant school
district on or before January 31 for the school fiscal year in which the
application is submitted. Such payment shall equal the maximum payment
determined pursuant to subsection (4) of this section, except that if the
sum of all maximum payments for applicant school districts for such
school fiscal year exceeds the available balance for such purpose in the
Education Future Fund, each payment shall be reduced proportionally so
-2-

LB598 LB598
2025 2025
that the sum of all payments for applicant school districts for such
school fiscal year equals the available balance for such purpose in the
fund.
Sec. 2. Section 79-1007.15, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1007.15 (1) For school fiscal year 2008-09, the department shall
calculate an elementary site allowance for any district in which (a) the
district has more than one elementary attendance site, (b) at least one
of the elementary attendance sites does not offer any other grades, (c)
the square miles in the district divided by the number of elementary
attendance sites in the district equals one hundred square miles or more
per elementary attendance site, and (d) the fall membership in elementary
site grades in the district divided by the number of elementary site
grades then divided again by the number of elementary attendance sites
equals fifteen or fewer students per grade per elementary attendance
site. Qualifying elementary attendance sites for such districts shall
only offer elementary site grades and shall have an average of fifteen or
fewer students per grade in the fall membership.
(2) For school fiscal year 2009-10 and each school fiscal year
thereafter, the department shall calculate an elementary site allowance
for any district which has at least one qualifying elementary attendance
site and which submits the information required for the calculation on a
form prescribed by the department on or before October 15 of the school
fiscal year preceding the school fiscal year for which aid is being
calculated. A qualifying elementary attendance site shall be an
elementary attendance site, in a district with multiple elementary
attendance sites, which does not have another elementary attendance site
within seven miles in the same school district or which is the only
public elementary attendance site located in an incorporated city or
village.
(3)(a) (3) The elementary site allowance for each qualifying
-3-

LB598 LB598
2025 2025
district shall equal the sum of the elementary site allowances for each
qualifying elementary attendance site in the district. The elementary
site allowance for each qualifying elementary attendance site shall equal
five hundred percent of the statewide average general fund operating
expenditures per formula student multiplied by the result of rounding the
ratio of the fall membership attributed to the elementary attendance site
divided by eight up to the next whole number if the result was not a
whole number, except that if the resulting whole number is greater than
the number of elementary site grades, the whole number shall be reduced
to equal the number of elementary site grades.
(b) An elementary attendance site that provides at least sixty
minutes of planning time per school day to its elementary school teachers
shall qualify for an additional funding allowance as part of the
elementary site allowance equal to one hundred percent of the statewide
average general fund operating expenditures per formula student
multiplied by the ratio of the fall membership attributed to the
elementary attendance site divided by eight.
(4) For purposes of this section:
(a) Each district shall determine which grades are considered
elementary site grades, except that (i) all grades designated as
elementary site grades shall be offered in each elementary attendance
site in the district, without any preference indicated by the school
board or any school district administrator for students to attend
different elementary attendance sites depending on their elementary site
grade level, for the school fiscal year for which aid is being calculated
and for each of the five school fiscal years preceding the school fiscal
year for which aid is being calculated and (ii) elementary site grades
shall not include grades nine, ten, eleven, or twelve;
(b) An elementary attendance site is an attendance site in which
elementary site grades are offered;
(c) The primary elementary site shall be the elementary attendance
-4-

LB598 LB598
2025 2025
site to which the most formula students are attributed in the district
and shall not be a qualifying elementary attendance site; and
(d) Fall membership means the fall membership for the school fiscal
year immediately preceding the school fiscal year for which aid is being
calculated.
(5) If the elementary attendance site is new or is being reopened
after being closed for at least one school year, the requirements of
subdivision (4)(a)(i) of this section with respect to preceding school
fiscal years shall not apply to school fiscal years in which the
elementary attendance site was not in operation.
(6) The department shall determine if the qualifications for the
elementary site allowance have been met for each elementary attendance
site for which information has been submitted. The department may rely on
the information submitted and any other information available to the
department, including, but not limited to, past attendance patterns. The
state board shall establish a procedure for appeal of decisions of the
department to the state board for a final determination.
Sec. 3. Section 79-1021, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1021 (1) The Education Future Fund is created. The fund shall be
administered by the department and shall consist of money transferred to
the fund by the Legislature. Transfers may be made from the Education
Future Fund to the Computer Science and Technology Education Fund at the
direction of the Legislature. Any money in the Education Future Fund
available for investment shall be invested by the state investment
officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska
State Funds Investment Act.
(2) The fund shall be used only for the following purposes, in order
of priority:
(a) To fully fund equalization aid under the Tax Equity and
Educational Opportunities Support Act;
-5-

LB598 LB598
2025 2025
(b) To fund reimbursements related to special education under
section 79-1142;
(c) To fund foundation aid under the Tax Equity and Educational
Opportunities Support Act;
(d) To increase funding for school districts in a way that results
in direct property tax relief, which means a dollar-for-dollar
replacement of property taxes by a state funding source;
(e) To provide funding for a grant program created by the
Legislature to address teacher turnover rates and keep existing teachers
in classrooms;
(f) To provide funding to increase career and technical educational
classroom opportunities for students, including, but not limited to,
computer science education. Such funding must provide students with the
academic and technical skills, knowledge, and training necessary to
succeed in future careers;
(g) To provide funding for a grant program created by the
Legislature to provide students the opportunity to have a mentor who will
continuously engage with the student directly to aid in the student's
professional growth and give ongoing support and encouragement to the
student;
(h) To provide funding for extraordinary increases in special
education expenditures to allow school districts with large, unexpected
special education expenditures to more easily meet the needs of all
students;
(i) To provide funding to help recruit teachers throughout the state
by utilizing apprenticeships through a teacher apprenticeship program and
an alternative certification process;
(j) To provide funding to develop and implement a professional
learning system to help provide sustained professional learning and
training regarding evidence-based reading instruction and for a grant
program relating to dyslexia research; and
-6-

LB598 LB598
2025 2025
(k) To provide funding for a pilot project administered by the State
Department of Education to provide menstrual products to school
districts; and .
(l) To provide funding for school districts with extraordinary
expenditures for limited English proficiency students to allow school
districts with such costs to better meet the needs of all students.
(3)(a) The State Treasurer shall transfer one billion dollars from
the General Fund to the Education Future Fund in fiscal year 2023-24, on
such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget administrator of
the budget division of the Department of Administrative Services.
(b) The State Treasurer shall transfer two hundred fifty million
dollars from the General Fund to the Education Future Fund in fiscal year
2024-25, on such dates and in such amounts as directed by the budget
administrator of the budget division of the Department of Administrative
Services.
(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that two hundred fifty
million dollars be transferred from the General Fund to the Education
Future Fund in fiscal year 2025-26 and each fiscal year thereafter.
Sec. 4. Section 79-1022, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1022 (1) On or before June 15, 2025 2023, and on or before March
1 of each year thereafter, the department shall determine the amounts to
be distributed to each local system for the ensuing school fiscal year
pursuant to the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act and
shall certify the amounts to the Director of Administrative Services, the
Auditor of Public Accounts, and each local system. On or before June 15,
2025 2023, and on or before March 1 of each year thereafter, the
department shall report the necessary funding level for the ensuing
school fiscal year to the Governor, the Appropriations Committee of the
Legislature, and the Education Committee of the Legislature. The report
submitted to the committees of the Legislature shall be submitted
-7-

LB598 LB598
2025 2025
electronically. Except as otherwise provided in this subsection,
certified state aid amounts, including adjustments pursuant to section
79-1065.02, shall be shown as budgeted non-property-tax receipts and
deducted prior to calculating the property tax request in the local
system's general fund budget statement as provided to the Auditor of
Public Accounts pursuant to section 79-1024.
(2) Except as provided in this subsection, subsection (8) of section
79-1016, and sections 79-1005, 79-1033, and 79-1065.02, the amounts
certified pursuant to subsection (1) of this section shall be distributed
in ten as nearly as possible equal payments on the last business day of
each month beginning in September of each ensuing school fiscal year and
ending in June of the following year, except that when a local system is
to receive a monthly payment of less than one thousand dollars, such
payment shall be one lump-sum payment on the last business day of
December during the ensuing school fiscal year.
Sec. 5. Section 79-1022.02, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1022.02 Notwithstanding any other provision of law, any
certification of state aid pursuant to section 79-1022, certification of
budget authority pursuant to section 79-1023, and certification of
applicable allowable reserve percentages pursuant to section 79-1027
completed prior to the effective date of this act June 1, 2023, for
school fiscal year 2025-26 2023-24 are null and void.
Sec. 6. Section 79-1023, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1023 (1) On or before June 15, 2025 2023, and on or before March
1 of each year thereafter, the department shall determine and certify to
each school district budget authority for the general fund budget of
expenditures for the ensuing school fiscal year.
(2) Except as provided in sections 79-1028.01, 79-1029, 79-1030, and
81-829.51, each school district shall have budget authority for the
-8-

LB598 LB598
2025 2025
general fund budget of expenditures equal to the greater of (a) the
general fund budget of expenditures for the immediately preceding school
fiscal year minus exclusions pursuant to subsection (1) of section
79-1028.01 for such school fiscal year with the difference increased by
the basic allowable growth rate for the school fiscal year for which
budget authority is being calculated, (b) the general fund budget of
expenditures for the immediately preceding school fiscal year minus
exclusions pursuant to subsection (1) of section 79-1028.01 for such
school fiscal year with the difference increased by an amount equal to
any student growth adjustment calculated for the school fiscal year for
which budget authority is being calculated, or (c) one hundred ten
percent of formula need for the school fiscal year for which budget
authority is being calculated minus the special education budget of
expenditures as filed on the school district budget statement on or
before September 30 for the immediately preceding school fiscal year,
which special education budget of expenditures is increased by the basic
allowable growth rate for the school fiscal year for which budget
authority is being calculated.
(3) For any school fiscal year for which the budget authority for
the general fund budget of expenditures for a school district is based on
a student growth adjustment, the budget authority for the general fund
budget of expenditures for such school district shall be adjusted in
future years to reflect any student growth adjustment corrections related
to such student growth adjustment.
Sec. 7. Section 79-1027, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1027 No district shall adopt a budget, which includes total
requirements of depreciation funds, necessary employee benefit fund cash
reserves, and necessary general fund cash reserves, exceeding the
applicable allowable reserve percentages of total general fund budget of
expenditures as specified in the schedule set forth in this section.
-9-

LB598 LB598
2025 2025
Average daily Allowable
membership of reserve
district percentage
0 - 471 45
471.01 - 3,044 35
3,044.01 - 10,000 25
10,000.01 and over 20
On or before June 15, 2025 2023, and on or before March 1 each year
thereafter, the department shall determine and certify each district's
applicable allowable reserve percentage for the ensuing school fiscal
year.
Each district with combined necessary general fund cash reserves,
total requirements of depreciation funds, and necessary employee benefit
fund cash reserves less than the applicable allowable reserve percentage
specified in this section may, notwithstanding the district's applicable
allowable growth rate, increase its necessary general fund cash reserves
such that the total necessary general fund cash reserves, total
requirements of depreciation funds, and necessary employee benefit fund
cash reserves do not exceed such applicable allowable reserve percentage.
Sec. 8. Section 79-1031.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1031.01 The Appropriations Committee of the Legislature shall
annually include the amount necessary to fund the state aid that will be
certified to school districts on or before June 15, 2025 2023, and on or
before March 1 of each year thereafter for each ensuing school fiscal
year in its recommendations to the Legislature to carry out the
requirements of the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act.
Sec. 9. Section 79-1142, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1142 (1) Level I services refers to services provided to children
with disabilities who require an aggregate of not more than three hours
-10-

LB598 LB598
2025 2025
per week of special education services and support services and includes
all administrative, diagnostic, consultative, and vocational-adjustment
counselor services.
(2) The total allowable reimbursable cost for support services shall
not exceed a percentage, established by the State Board of Education, of
the school district's or approved cooperative's total allowable
reimbursable cost for all special education programs and support
services. The percentage established by the board for support services
shall not exceed the difference of ten percent minus the percentage of
the appropriations for special education approved by the Legislature set
aside for reimbursements for support services pursuant to subsection (5)
of this section.
(3) Except as provided in subsection (7) (6) of this section, for
special education and support services provided in each school fiscal
year, the department shall reimburse each school district in the
following school fiscal year eighty percent of the total allowable excess
costs for all special education programs and support services.
Cooperatives of school districts or educational service units shall also
be eligible for reimbursement for cooperative programs pursuant to this
section if such cooperatives or educational service units have complied
with the reporting and approval requirements of section 79-1155 for
cooperative programs which were offered in the preceding school fiscal
year.
(4)(a) The payments shall be made by the department to the school
district of residence, cooperative of school districts, or educational
service unit each school year in a minimum of seven payments between the
fifth and twentieth day of each month beginning in December. Additional
payments may be made based upon additional valid claims submitted. The
State Treasurer shall, between the fifth and twentieth day of each month,
notify the Director of Administrative Services of the amount of funds
available in the General Fund and the Education Future Fund for payment
-11-

LB598 LB598
2025 2025
purposes. The director shall, upon receiving such certification, draw
warrants against such funds as appropriated.
(b) If the General Fund appropriations for special education
approved by the Legislature, minus the amounts set aside pursuant to
subsection (5) of this section, are insufficient to reimburse eighty
percent of the total allowable excess costs for all special education
programs and support services for any school fiscal year:
(i) Such allowable excess costs shall be reimbursed from the General
Fund appropriations for special education approved by the Legislature,
minus the amounts set aside pursuant to subsection (5) of this section,
on a pro rata basis at the maximum rate of reimbursement such
appropriations will allow as determined by the department; and
(ii) The remainder of the eighty percent reimbursement of such
allowable excess costs shall be paid from the Education Future Fund.
(5) Residential settings described in subdivision (10)(c) of section
79-215 shall be reimbursed for the educational services, including
special education services and support services, in an amount determined
pursuant to the average per pupil cost of the service agency.
Reimbursements pursuant to this section shall be made from funds set
aside for such purpose within sixty days after receipt of a reimbursement
request submitted in the manner required by the department and including
any documentation required by the department for educational services
that have been provided, except that if there are not any funds available
for the remainder of the state fiscal year for such reimbursements, the
reimbursement shall occur within thirty days after the beginning of the
immediately following state fiscal year. The department may audit any
required documentation and subtract any payments made in error from
future reimbursements. The department shall set aside separate amounts
from the appropriations for special education approved by the Legislature
for reimbursements pursuant to this subsection for students receiving
special education services and for students receiving support services
-12-

LB598 LB598
2025 2025
for each state fiscal year. The amounts set aside for each purpose shall
be based on estimates of the reimbursements to be requested during the
state fiscal year and shall not be less than the total amount of
reimbursements requested in the prior state fiscal year plus any unpaid
requests from the prior state fiscal year.
(6) For school fiscal year 2025-26 and each school fiscal year
thereafter, the department shall also reimburse each school district or
approved cooperative for additional costs attributable to students
receiving services under a plan pursuant to the requirements of section
504 of the federal Rehabilitation Act of 1973, 29 U.S.C. 794, as such
section existed on January 1, 2025. Reimbursement under this subsection
shall be provided at the same percentage as the reimbursement for special
education programs and support services described in subsection (3) of
this section, and the department shall establish procedures for school
districts and cooperatives to report and document such additional costs.
Such reimbursement shall be in addition to, and not a replacement for,
special education reimbursement funding provided under this section.
(7) (6) For each school district that received a payment pursuant to
the Extraordinary Increase in Special Education Expenditures Act in the
school fiscal year for which special education expenditures were
reimbursed pursuant to subsection (3) of this section, an amount equal to
such payment shall be subtracted from the reimbursement calculated
pursuant to subsection (3) of this section and such amount shall be
transferred to the Education Future Fund.
(8) (7) On or before November 15 of each year, the department shall
submit to the Governor, the Appropriations Committee of the Legislature,
and the Education Committee of the Legislature:
(a) The total allowable excess costs for all special education
programs and support services for all school districts, cooperatives of
school districts, and educational service units; and
(b) The total reimbursements requested pursuant to subsection (5) of
-13-

LB598 LB598
2025 2025
this section for the most recently completed school fiscal year; and .
(c) The total reimbursements provided pursuant to subsection (6) of
this section for the most recently completed school fiscal year.
Sec. 10. Section 1 of this act becomes operative on January 1,
2026. The other sections of this act become operative on their effective
date.
Sec. 11. Original sections 79-1007.15, 79-1021, 79-1022,
79-1022.02, 79-1023, 79-1027, 79-1031.01, and 79-1142, Reissue Revised
Statutes of Nebraska, are repealed.
Sec. 12. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when
passed and approved according to law.
-14-